tests/data/double-clitics-mono.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂáàÁÀäÄöÖšŠčČðđÐ</alphabet>
        <sdefs>
          <sdef n="vblex"/>
          <sdef n="pp"/>
          <sdef n="prn" />
          <sdef n="ger" />
          <sdef n="inf" />
          <sdef n="enc" />
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
<pardef n="__vblex">
 <e>  <p><l>-b-c</l>  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/>b<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><j/>c<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/></r></p></e>
 <e>  <p><l></l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
	</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
 <e><i>a</i><par n="__vblex"/> <p><l><b/>d</l><r><g><b/>d</g></r></p></e>
 <e><i>x</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
 <e><i>y</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
</section>
</dictionary>
